Missouri, session 2026, HB2069.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 304, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto nine new sections, to
be known as sections 304.920, 304.923, 304.926, 304.927, 304.928, 304.929, 304.930,
304.931, and 304.932, to read as follows:
304.920. As used in sections 304.920 to 304.932, the following terms mean:
(1) "Automated driving system", the hardware and software that are collectively
capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless
of whether it is limited to a specific operational design domain;
(2) "Dynamic driving task", all of the real-time operational and tactical
functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic, excluding the strategic
functions such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and way points, and
including, but not limited to:
(a) Lateral vehicle motion control via steering;
(b) Longitudinal motion control via acceleration and deceleration;
(c) Monitoring the driving environment via object and event detection,
recognition, classification, and response preparation;
(d) Object and event response execution;
(e) Maneuver planning; and
(f) Enhancing conspicuity via lighting, signaling, and gesturing;
(3) "Dynamic driving task fallback", the response by the person or human
driver to either perform the dynamic driving task or achieve a minimal risk condition
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2069 & 2208 2
after occurrence of a dynamic driving task performance-relevant system failure or
failures or upon operational design domain exit, or the response by an automated
driving system to achieve minimal risk condition, given the same circumstances;
(4) "Fully autonomous vehicle", a motor vehicle equipped with an automated
driving system designed to function without a human driver as a level 4 or level 5 system
under SAE J3016B;
(5) "Human driver", a natural person in the vehicle with a valid license to
operate a motor vehicle who controls all or part of the dynamic driving task;
(6) "Minimal risk condition", a condition to which a person, human driver, or an
automated driving system may bring a vehicle after performing the dynamic driving
task fallback in order to reduce the risk of a crash when a given trip cannot or should
not be completed;
(7) "On-demand autonomous vehicle network", a transportation service
network that uses a software application or other digital means to dispatch or
otherwise enable the prearrangement of transportation with fully autonomous vehicles
for purposes of transporting passengers or goods, including for-hire transportation and
transportation of passengers or goods for compensation;
(8) "Operational design domain", operating conditions under which a given
automated driving system is specifically designed to function including, but not limited
to, environmental, geographical, and time-of-day restrictions, or the requisite presence
or absence of certain traffic or roadway characteristics;
(9) "Request to intervene", notification by an automated driving system to a
human driver that the human driver should promptly begin or resume performance of
part or all of the dynamic driving task;
(10) "SAE J3016B", the "Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms Related to
Driving Automation Systems for On-Road Motor Vehicles", published by SAE
International in April 2021.
304.923. 1. A person may operate a fully autonomous vehicle on the public roads
of this state without a human driver, provided that the automated driving system is
engaged and the vehicle meets the following conditions:
(1) If a failure of the automated driving system occurs that renders the system
unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to its intended operational
design domain, the fully autonomous vehicle will achieve a minimal risk condition;
(2) The fully autonomous vehicle is capable of operating in compliance with the
applicable traffic and motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of this state when
reasonable to do so unless an exemption has been granted by the department of public
safety;

HCS HBs 2069 & 2208 3
(3) When required by federal law, the vehicle bears the required manufacturer's
certification label indicating that at the time of its manufacture it has been certified to
be in compliance with all applicable Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, including
reference to any exemption granted by the National Highway Traffic Safety
Administration.
2. Prior to operating a fully autonomous vehicle on the public roads of this state
without a human driver, a person shall submit a law enforcement plan to the
department of public safety that describes:
(1) How to communicate with a fleet support specialist who is available during
the times the vehicle is in operation;
(2) How to safely remove the fully autonomous vehicle from the roadway and
steps to safely tow the vehicle;
(3) How to recognize whether the fully autonomous is in autonomous mode; and
(4) Any additional information the manufacturer or owner deems necessary
regarding hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated with the operation of
the fully autonomous vehicle.
304.926. 1. When an automated driving system installed on a motor vehicle is
engaged:
(1) The automated driving system is considered the driver or operator, for the
purpose of assessing compliance with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws and shall
be deemed to satisfy electronically all physical acts required by a driver or operator of
the vehicle; and
(2) The automated driving system is considered to be licensed to operate the
vehicle.
2. Before operating a fully autonomous vehicle on public roads in this state
without a human driver, a person shall submit to the department of revenue proof of
financial responsibility, as defined in section 303.020, for the vehicle.
3. In the event of a crash:
(1) The fully autonomous vehicle shall remain on the scene of the crash when
required under section 303.040, consistent with its capability under section 304.923; and
(2) The owner of the fully autonomous vehicle, or a person on behalf of the
vehicle owner, shall report any crashes or collisions consistent with section 303.040.
304.927. An on-demand autonomous vehicle network shall be permitted to
operate pursuant to state laws governing the operation of transportation network
companies, taxis, or any other ground transportation for-hire of passengers, with the
exception that any provision of this chapter that reasonably applies only to a human

HCS HBs 2069 & 2208 4
driver would not apply to the operation of fully autonomous vehicles with the automated
driving system engaged on an on-demand autonomous vehicle network.
304.928. 1. A fully autonomous vehicle shall be properly registered in
accordance with chapter 301. If a fully autonomous vehicle is registered in this state, the
vehicle shall be identified on the registration as a fully autonomous vehicle.
2. A fully autonomous vehicle shall be properly titled in accordance with chapter
301. If a fully autonomous vehicle is titled in this state, the vehicle shall be identified on
the title as a fully autonomous vehicle.
304.929. 1. A person may operate a motor vehicle equipped with an automated
driving system capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task if:
(1) Such automated driving system will issue a request to intervene whenever the
automated driving system is not capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task
with the exception that the person will respond appropriately to such a request; and
(2) The automated driving system is capable of being operated in compliance
with this chapter when reasonable to do so unless an exemption has been granted by the
department of public safety.
2. Nothing in sections 304.920 to 304.932 prohibits or restricts a human driver
from operating a fully autonomous vehicle equipped with controls that allow for the
human driver to control all or part of the dynamic driving task.
304.930. A fully autonomous vehicle that is also a commercial vehicle as defined
in section 301.010 may operate pursuant to state laws governing the operation of
commercial motor vehicles, except that any provision that by its nature reasonably
applies only to a human driver does not apply to such a vehicle operating with the
automated driving system engaged.
304.931. A fully autonomous vehicle that is designed to be operated exclusively
by the automated driving system for all trips is not subject to motor vehicle equipment
laws or regulations of this state that:
(1) Relate to or support motor vehicle operation by a human driver seated in the
vehicle; and
(2) Are not relevant to an automated driving system.
304.932. 1. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter and notwithstanding any
other provision of law, fully autonomous vehicles and automated driving systems are
governed exclusively by sections 304.920 to 304.932. The director of the department of
public safety may promulgate rules necessary to implement these sections. The
department shall be the sole agency that may implement the provisions of these sections.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010 that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies

HCS HBs 2069 & 2208 5
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall
be invalid and void.
2. No state agency, political subdivision, municipality, or local entity shall
prohibit the operation of fully autonomous vehicles, automated driving systems, or on-
demand autonomous vehicle networks, or otherwise enact or keep in force rules or
ordinances that would impose taxes, fees, or other requirements, including performance
standards, specific to the operation of fully autonomous vehicles, automated driving
systems, or on-demand autonomous vehicle networks in addition to the requirements of
sections 304.920 to 304.932.
✔